Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2384
Local hospital district; secretary-treasurer; violation; penalty; recovery under bond; procedure.

If the secretary-treasurer shall willfully fail or refuse at any time to do or perform any act required of him or her by sections 77-2369 to 77-2385, he or she shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor. It shall be the duty of the appropriate county attorney or the Attorney General to enter and prosecute to final determination all suits for the recovery of any penalty arising under the conditions of any bond required to be given by the provisions of such sections.

Laws 1994, LB 1118, § 16.